Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1571.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 431A.175 is amended to read:
431A.175. (1) As used in this section and ORS 431A.183:
(a)(A) “Inhalant delivery system” means:
(i) A device that can be used to deliver nicotine or cannabinoids in the form of a vapor or aer-
osol to a person inhaling from the device; or
(ii) A component of a device described in this subparagraph or a substance in any form sold for
the purpose of being vaporized or aerosolized by a device described in this subparagraph, whether
or not the component or substance is sold separately [or is not sold separately].
(B) “Inhalant delivery system” does not include:
(i) Any product that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for
sale as a tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if the product is marketed
and sold solely for the approved purpose; and
(ii) Tobacco products.
(b) “Nicotine” means any form of the chemical nicotine, regardless of whether the
chemical is naturally or synthetically derived, including any salt, complex, alkaloid or analog
of nicotine.
[(b)] (c)(A) “Tobacco products” means:
[(A)] (i) Any product that contains or is made or derived from tobacco or nicotine and
that is likely to be used for human consumption by any means, including in the forms of
bidis, cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques, granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed and other
smoking tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing
tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and sweepings of tobacco and other forms of
tobacco[, prepared in a manner that makes the tobacco suitable for chewing or smoking in a pipe or
otherwise, or for both chewing and smoking], oral nicotine pouches, nicotine lozenges and other
products that contain nicotine;
[(B)] (ii) Cigarettes as defined in ORS 323.010 (1); or
[(C)] (iii) A device that:
[(i)] (I) Can be used to deliver tobacco products to a person using the device; and
[(ii)] (II) Has not been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale
as a tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if the product is marketed and
sold solely for the approved purpose.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1571 (SB 1571-A) Page 1

(B) “Tobacco products” does not include an article that is food, as defined in ORS 616.205,
if the article does not contain nicotine or contains no more than trace amounts of naturally
occurring nicotine.
(2) It is unlawful to:
(a) [To] Violate ORS 167.755.
(b) [To] Fail as a retailer of tobacco products to post a notice substantially similar to the notice
described in subsection (3) of this section in a location that is clearly visible to the seller and the
purchaser of the tobacco products.
(c) [To] Fail as a retailer of inhalant delivery systems to post a notice in a location that is
clearly visible to the seller and the purchaser of the inhalant delivery systems that it is unlawful
to sell inhalant delivery systems to persons under 21 years of age. The Oregon Health Authority
shall adopt by rule the content of the notice required under this paragraph.
(d) [To] Distribute, sell or allow to be sold an inhalant delivery system if the inhalant delivery
system is not labeled in accordance with rules adopted by the authority.
(e) [To] Distribute, sell or allow to be sold an inhalant delivery system if the inhalant delivery
system is not packaged in child-resistant safety packaging, as required by the authority by rule.
(f) [To] Distribute, sell or allow to be sold an inhalant delivery system if the inhalant delivery
system is packaged in a manner that is attractive to minors, as determined by the authority by rule.
(g) [To] Distribute, sell or allow to be sold cigarettes in any form other than a sealed package
that contains at least 20 cigarettes.
(3) The notice required by subsection (2)(b) of this section must be substantially as follows:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE
The sale of tobacco in any form to persons under 21 years of age is prohibited by law. Any
person who sells, or allows to be sold, tobacco to a person under 21 years of age is in violation of
Oregon law.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) Rules adopted under subsection (2)(d), (e) and (f) of this section must be consistent with any
regulation adopted by the United States Food and Drug Administration related to labeling or pack-
aging requirements for inhalant delivery systems.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1571 (SB 1571-A) Page 2

Passed by Senate February 20, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by House March 2, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1571 (SB 1571-A) Page 3